Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2313
Certificate of competency; permit; fees.

Fees for the original certificates, renewal certificates, and permits shall be fixed by the city council or village board of trustees of each city or village having an air conditioning air distribution board. The fee for the original or renewal certificate shall in no event be more than fifty dollars.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 13, p. 472;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 157.